Hawaii statutes.
§54-62 Disbursement of funds. All
moneys expended by the board of water supply pursuant to this part shall be
disbursed by the county treasurer on vouchers signed by the chairperson or
acting chairperson of the board. [L 1949, c 86, §12; RL 1955, §146-111; HRS
§54-62; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next